Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
79-2121
Plan to reduce excessive absenteeism;
development and participation.

The superintendents of any school districts that are members
of a learning community shall develop and participate in a plan by August
1, 2011, to reduce excessive absenteeism including a process to share information
regarding at-risk youth with the goal of improving educational outcomes, providing
effective interventions that impact risk factors, and reducing unnecessary
penetration deeper into the juvenile justice system. For purposes of this
section, at-risk youth means children who are under the supervision of the
Office of Probation Administration, are committed to the care, custody, or
supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services, are otherwise
involved in the juvenile justice system, or have been absent from school for
more than five days per quarter or the hourly equivalent except when excused
by school authorities or when a documented illness makes attendance impossible
or impracticable.

Laws 2011, LB463, § 22.